Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB699.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "alternative energy sources" and "tier I alternative energy source" in section 2 of the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Alternative energy sources." The term shall include the 123456789101112131415161718192021 following existing and new sources for the production of electricity:* * *(9.1) Linear generators, which shall mean an integrated system consisting of oscillators, cylinders, electricity conversion equipment and associated balance of plant components, that:(i) converts the linear motion of oscillators directly into electricity without the use of a flame or spark;(ii) is dispatchable with the ability to vary power output across all loads; and(iii) can operate on multiple fuel types, including renewable fuels such as hydrogen, ammonia and biogas.* * *"Tier I alternative energy source." Energy derived from:* * *(6.1) Linear generators.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0699PN1097 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920